District of Columbia statutes.
6-406

Appropriations.

The appropriation available for opening alleys and minor streets in the District of Columbia is hereby made available for the purpose of establishing building lines as provided for in this chapter.

June 21, 1906, 34 Stat. 385, ch. 3505, § 5
New streets and alleys, scope of Mayor’s authority, see § 9-203.01.
1981 Ed., § 5-206.
1973 Ed., § 5-206.